Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 7
MARKETING CONTRACTS

7-58-701. Authority.

In this part 7, "marketing contract" means a contract between a limited cooperative association and another person, which person need not be a patron member:

Requiring the other person to sell, or deliver for sale or marketing on the person's behalf, a specified part of the person's products, commodities, or goods exclusively to or through the association or any facilities furnished by the association; or

Authorizing the association to act for the person in any manner with respect to the products, commodities, or goods.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 789, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-702. Marketing contracts.

If a marketing contract provides for the sale of products, commodities, or goods to a limited cooperative association, the sale transfers title to the association upon delivery or at any other specific time expressly provided by the contract.

A marketing contract may:

Authorize a limited cooperative association to create an enforceable security interest in the products, commodities, or goods delivered; and

Allow the association to sell the products, commodities, or goods delivered and pay the sales price on a pooled or other basis after deducting selling costs, processing costs, overhead, expenses, and other charges.

Some or all of the provisions of a marketing contract between a patron member and a limited cooperative association may be contained in the articles or bylaws.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 789, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-703. Duration of marketing contract.

The initial duration of a marketing contract may not exceed ten years, but the contract may be self-renewing for additional periods not exceeding five years each. Unless the contract provides for another manner or time for termination, either party may terminate the contract by giving notice in a record at least ninety days before the end of the current term.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 790, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-704. Remedies for breach of contract.

Damages to be paid to a limited cooperative association for breach or anticipatory repudiation of a marketing contract may be liquidated, but only at an amount or under a formula that is reasonable in light of the actual or anticipated harm caused by the breach or repudiation. A provision that so provides is not a penalty.

Upon a breach of a marketing contract, whether by anticipatory repudiation or otherwise, a limited cooperative association may seek:

An injunction to prevent further breach; and

Specific performance.

The remedies in this section are in addition to any other remedies available to an association under law other than this part 7.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 790, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.